California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(a) The summons shall be in the form specified in Section 412.20 except that when the defendant is served, the defendant’s response shall be filed within 10 days, excluding Saturdays and Sundays and other judicial holidays, after the complaint is served upon the defendant.

(b) If service is completed by mail or in person through the Secretary of State’s address confidentiality program under Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 6205) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the defendant shall have an additional five court days to file a response.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the summons shall be
 issued and served and returned in the same manner as a summons in a civil action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 512, Sec. 1.   (AB 2347)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1167.1.

If proof of service of the summons has not been filed within 60 days of the complaint’s filing, the court may dismiss the action without prejudice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 336, Sec. 4.   (AB 2819)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1167.3.

In any action under this chapter, unless otherwise ordered by the court for good cause shown, the time allowed the defendant to answer the complaint, answer the complaint, if amended, or amend the answer under paragraph (2), (3), (5), (6), or (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 586 shall not exceed five days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 344, Sec. 19.   Effective September 7, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1167.4.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in any action under this chapter:

(a) Where the defendant files a notice of motion as provided for in subdivision (a) of Section 418.10, the time for making the motion shall be not less than three days nor more than seven days after the filing of the notice.

(b) The service and filing of a notice of motion under subdivision (a) shall extend the defendant’s time to plead until five days after service upon him of the written notice of entry of an order denying
 his motion, except that for good cause shown the court may extend the defendant’s time to plead for an additional period not exceeding 15 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1332.)
-------------------------------------------

1167.5.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court for good cause shown, no extension of time allowed in any action under this chapter for the causes specified in Section 1054 shall exceed 10 days without the consent of the adverse party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 849.)
-------------------------------------------

1169.

If, at the time appointed, any defendant served with a summons does not appear and defend, the clerk, upon written application of the plaintiff and proof of the service of summons and complaint, shall enter the default of any defendant so served, and, if requested by the plaintiff, immediately shall enter judgment for restitution of the premises and shall issue a writ of execution thereon. The application for default judgment and the default judgment shall include a place to indicate that the judgment includes tenants, subtenants, if any, named claimants, if
 any, and any other occupants of the premises. Thereafter, the plaintiff may apply to the court for any other relief demanded in the complaint, including the costs, against the defendant, or defendants, or against one or more of the defendants.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 263, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.

(a) On or before the day fixed for their appearance, the defendant may appear and answer, demur, or move to strike any portion of the complaint.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, in any action under this chapter in which the defendant demurs or moves to strike the complaint or any portion thereof, the hearing on the motion shall be not less than five court days nor more than seven court days after the filing of the notice of motion. All moving and supporting papers shall accompany the notice of the motion and shall be served in compliance with this section and Section 1010.6 or 1013.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the court may order the hearing held on a later date upon the written stipulation of the parties. In the case of a residential tenancy, the court, for good cause shown, may order the hearing held on a later date on notice prescribed by the court. In the case of a commercial tenancy, the court, for good cause shown, may order the hearing held on a later date not to exceed 10 court days after the first date set for a hearing on the motion.

(c) An opposition and reply to an opposition may be made orally at the time of the hearing. If a party seeks to have a written opposition considered in advance of the hearing, the written opposition shall be filed and served on or before the court day before the hearing. Service shall be by personal delivery, electronic service, fax transmission, express mail, or other means consistent with Sections 1010, 1010.6, 1011, 1012, and 1013, and reasonably calculated to ensure delivery to the other party or parties no later than the close of business on the court day before the hearing. The court, in its discretion, may consider written opposition filed later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 299, Sec. 1.   (AB 1384)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.5.

(a) If the defendant appears pursuant to Section 1170, trial of the proceeding shall be held not later than the 20th day following the date that the request to set the time of the trial is made. Judgment shall be entered thereon and, if the plaintiff prevails, a writ of execution shall be issued immediately by the court upon the request of the plaintiff.

(b) The court may extend the period for trial upon the agreement of all of the parties. No other extension of the time for trial of an action under this chapter may be
 granted unless the court, upon its own motion or on motion of any party, holds a hearing and renders a decision thereon as specified in subdivision (c).

(c) If trial is not held within the time specified in this section, the court, upon finding that there is a reasonable probability that the plaintiff will prevail in the action, shall determine the amount of damages, if any, to be suffered by the plaintiff by reason of the extension, and shall issue an order requiring the defendant to pay that amount into court as the rent would have otherwise become due and payable or into an escrow designated by the court for so long as the defendant remains in possession pending the termination of the action.

The determination of the amount of the payment shall be based on the plaintiff’s verified statement of the contract rent for rental payment, any verified objection thereto filed by the defendant, and the oral
 or demonstrative evidence presented at the hearing. The court’s determination of the amount of damages shall include consideration of any evidence, presented by the parties, embracing the issue of diminution of value or any set off permitted by law.

(d) If the defendant fails to make a payment ordered by the court, trial of the action shall be held within 15 days of the date payment was due.

(e) Any cost for administration of an escrow account pursuant to this section shall be recoverable by the prevailing party as part of any recoverable cost in the action.

(f) After trial of the action, the court shall determine the distribution of the payment made into court or the escrow designated by the court.

(g) Where payments into court or the escrow designated
 by the court are made pursuant to this section, the court may order that the payments be invested in an insured interest-bearing account. Interest on the account shall be allocated to the parties in the same proportions as the original funds are allocated.

(h) If any provision of this section or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the section which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this section are severable.

(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed to abrogate or interfere with the precedence given to the trial of criminal cases over the trial of civil matters by Section 1050 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1620, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.7.

A motion for summary judgment may be made at any time after the answer is filed upon giving five days notice. Summary judgment shall be granted or denied on the same basis as a motion under Section 437c.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1620, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.8.

In any action under this chapter, a discovery motion may be made at any time upon giving five days’ notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 113, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.9.

The Judicial Council shall adopt rules, not inconsistent with statute, prescribing the time for filing and serving opposition and reply papers, if any, relating to a motion under Section 1167.4, 1170.7, or 1170.8.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 113, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1171.

Whenever an issue of fact is presented by the pleadings, it must be tried by a jury, unless such jury be waived as in other cases. The jury shall be formed in the same manner as other trial juries in an action of the same jurisdictional classification in the Court in which the action is pending.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 120.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1172.

On the trial of any proceeding for any forcible entry or forcible detainer, the plaintiff shall only be required to show, in addition to the forcible entry or forcible detainer complained of, that he was peaceably in the actual possession at the time of the forcible entry, or was entitled to the possession at the time of the forcible detainer. The defendant may show in his defense that he or his ancestors, or those whose interest in such premises he claims, have been in the quiet possession thereof for the space of one whole year together next before the commencement of the proceedings, and that his interest therein is not then ended or
 determined; and such showing is a bar to the proceedings.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1173.

When, upon the trial of any proceeding under this chapter, it appears from the evidence that the defendant has been guilty of either a forcible entry or a forcible or unlawful detainer, and other than the offense charged in the complaint, the Judge must order that such complaint be forthwith amended to conform to such proofs; such amendment must be made without any imposition of terms. No continuance shall be permitted upon account of such amendment unless the defendant, by affidavit filed, shows to the satisfaction of the Court good cause therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1885, Ch. 121.)
-------------------------------------------

1174.

(a) If upon the trial, the verdict of the jury, or, if the case be tried without a jury, the findings of the court be in favor of the plaintiff and against the defendant, judgment shall be entered for the possession of the premises; and if the proceedings be for an unlawful detainer after neglect, or failure to perform the conditions or covenants of the lease or agreement under which the property is held, or after default in the payment of rent, the judgment shall also declare the forfeiture of that lease or agreement if the notice required
 by Section 1161 states the election of the landlord to declare the forfeiture thereof, but if that notice does not so state that election, the lease or agreement shall not be forfeited.

Except as provided in Section 1166a, in any action for unlawful detainer brought by a petroleum distributor against a gasoline dealer, possession shall not be restored to the petroleum distributor unless the court in the unlawful detainer action determines that the petroleum distributor had good cause under Section 20999.1 of the Business and Professions Code to terminate, cancel, or refuse to renew the franchise of the gasoline dealer.

In any action for unlawful detainer brought by a petroleum distributor against the gasoline dealer, the court may, at the time of request of either party, require the tenant to make rental payments into the court, for the lessor, at the contract rate, pending the resolution of the action.

(b) The jury or the court, if the proceedings be tried without a jury, shall also assess the damages occasioned to the plaintiff by any forcible entry, or by any forcible or unlawful detainer, alleged in the complaint and proved on the trial, and find the amount of any rent due, if the alleged unlawful detainer be after default in the payment of rent. If the defendant is found guilty of forcible entry, or forcible or unlawful detainer, and malice is shown, the plaintiff may be awarded statutory damages of up to six hundred dollars ($600), in addition to actual damages, including rent found due. The trier of fact shall determine whether actual damages, statutory damages, or both, shall be awarded, and judgment shall be entered accordingly.

(c) When the proceeding is for an unlawful detainer after default in the payment of rent, and the lease or agreement under which the rent is
 payable has not by its terms expired, and the notice required by Section 1161 has not stated the election of the landlord to declare the forfeiture thereof, the court may, and, if the lease or agreement is in writing, is for a term of more than one year, and does not contain a forfeiture clause, shall order that a writ shall not be issued to enforce the judgment until the expiration of five days after the entry of the judgment, within which time the tenant, or any subtenant, or any mortgagee of the term, or any other party interested in its continuance, may pay into the court, for the landlord, the amount found due as rent, with interest thereon, and the amount of the damages found by the jury or the court for the unlawful detainer, and the costs of the proceedings, and thereupon the judgment shall be satisfied and the tenant be restored to the tenant’s estate. If payment as provided in this subdivision is not made within five days, the judgment may be enforced for its full amount and for the possession of
 the premises. In all other cases the judgment may be enforced immediately.

(d) Subject to subdivision (c), the judgment for possession of the premises may be enforced as provided in Division 3 (commencing with Section 712.010) of Title 9 of Part 2.

(e) Personal property remaining on the premises which the landlord reasonably believes to have been lost shall be disposed of pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 2080) of Chapter 4 of Title 6 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code. The landlord is not liable to the owner of any property which is disposed of in this manner. If the appropriate police or sheriff’s department refuses to accept that property, it shall be deemed not to have been lost for the purposes of this subdivision.

(f) The landlord shall give notice pursuant to Section 1983 of the Civil Code
 to any person (other than the tenant) reasonably believed by the landlord to be the owner of personal property remaining on the premises unless the procedure for surrender of property under Section 1965 of the Civil Code has been initiated or completed.

(g) The landlord shall store the personal property in a place of safekeeping until it is either released pursuant to subdivision (h) or disposed of pursuant to subdivision (i).

(h) The landlord shall release the personal property pursuant to Section 1965 of the Civil Code or shall release it to the tenant or, at the landlord’s option, to a person reasonably believed by the landlord to be its owner if the tenant or other person pays the costs of storage as provided in Section 1990 of the Civil Code and claims the property not later than the date specified in the writ of possession before which the tenant must make his or her claim
 or the date specified in the notice before which a person other than the tenant must make his or her claim.

(i) Personal property not released pursuant to subdivision (h) shall be disposed of pursuant to Section 1988 of the Civil Code.

(j) Where the landlord releases personal property to the tenant pursuant to subdivision (h), the landlord is not liable with respect to that property to any person.

(k) Where the landlord releases personal property pursuant to subdivision (h) to a person (other than the tenant) reasonably believed by the landlord to be its owner, the landlord is not liable with respect to that property to:

(1) The tenant or to any person to whom notice was given pursuant to subdivision (f); or

(2) Any other person, unless that person proves that, prior to releasing the property, the landlord believed or reasonably should have believed that the person had an interest in the property and also that the landlord knew or should have known upon reasonable investigation the address of that person.

(l) Where personal property is disposed of pursuant to Section 1988 of the Civil Code, the landlord is not liable with respect to that property to:

(1) The tenant or to any person to whom notice was given pursuant to subdivision (f); or

(2) Any other person, unless that person proves that, prior to disposing of the property pursuant to Section 1988 of the Civil Code, the landlord believed or reasonably should have believed that the person had an interest
 in the property and also that the landlord knew or should have known upon reasonable investigation the address of that person.

(m) For the purposes of subdivisions (e), (f), (h), (k), and (l), the terms “owner,” “premises,” and “reasonable belief” have the same meaning as provided in Section 1980 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 755, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1174.2.

(a) In an unlawful detainer proceeding involving residential premises after default in payment of rent and in which the tenant has raised as an affirmative defense a breach of the landlord’s obligations under Section 1941 of the Civil Code or of any warranty of habitability, the court shall determine whether a substantial breach of these obligations has occurred. If the court finds that a substantial breach has occurred, the court (1) shall determine the reasonable rental value of the premises in its untenantable state to the date of
 trial, (2) shall deny possession to the landlord and adjudge the tenant to be the prevailing party, conditioned upon the payment by the tenant of the rent that has accrued to the date of the trial as adjusted pursuant to this subdivision within a reasonable period of time not exceeding five days, from the date of the court’s judgment or, if service of the court’s judgment is made by mail, the payment shall be made within the time set forth in Section 1013, (3) may order the landlord to make repairs and correct the conditions which constitute a breach of the landlord’s obligations, (4) shall order that the monthly rent be limited to the reasonable rental value of the premises as determined pursuant to this subdivision until repairs are completed, and (5) except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), shall award the tenant costs and attorneys’ fees if provided by, and pursuant to, any statute or the contract of the parties. If the court orders repairs or corrections, or both, pursuant to paragraph (3), the
 court’s jurisdiction continues over the matter for the purpose of ensuring compliance. The court shall, however, award possession of the premises to the landlord if the tenant fails to pay all rent accrued to the date of trial, as determined due in the judgment, within the period prescribed by the court pursuant to this subdivision. The tenant shall, however, retain any rights conferred by Section 1174.

(b) If the court determines that there has been no substantial breach of Section 1941 of the Civil Code or of any warranty of habitability by the landlord or if the tenant fails to pay all rent accrued to the date of trial, as required by the court pursuant to subdivision (a), then judgment shall be entered in favor of the landlord, and the landlord shall be the prevailing party for the purposes of awarding costs or attorneys’ fees pursuant to any statute or the contract of the parties.

(c) As used in this section, “substantial breach” means the failure of the landlord to comply with applicable building and housing code standards which materially affect health and safety.

(d) Nothing in this section is intended to deny the tenant the right to a trial by jury. Nothing in this section shall limit or supersede any provision of Chapter 12.75 (commencing with Section 7060) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1174.21.

A landlord who institutes an unlawful detainer proceeding based upon a tenant’s nonpayment of rent, and who is liable for a violation of Section 1942.4 of the Civil Code, shall be liable to the tenant or lessee for reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs of the suit, in an amount to be fixed by the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 109, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1174.25.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), an occupant who is served with a prejudgment claim of right to possession in accordance with Section 415.46 may file a claim as prescribed in Section 415.46, with the court within 10 days of the date of service of the prejudgment claim of right to possession as shown on the return of service, which period shall include Saturday and Sunday but exclude all other judicial holidays. If the last day
 for filing the claim falls on a Saturday or Sunday, the filing period shall be extended to and including the next court day. Filing the prejudgment claim of right to possession shall constitute a general appearance for which a fee shall be collected as provided in Section 70614 of the Government Code. Section 68511.3 of the Government Code applies to the prejudgment claim of right to possession.

(2) In an action as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 415.46, an occupant may file a prejudgment claim of right to possession at any time before judgment is entered.

(b) At the time of filing, the claimant shall be added as a defendant in the action for unlawful detainer and the clerk shall notify the plaintiff that the claimant has been added as a defendant in the action by mailing a copy of the claim filed with the court to the plaintiff with a notation so
 indicating. The claimant shall answer or otherwise respond to the summons and complaint within five days, including Saturdays and Sundays, but excluding all other judicial holidays, after filing the prejudgment claim of possession. Thereafter, the name of the claimant shall be added to any pleading, filing or form filed in the action for unlawful detainer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 913, Sec. 8.   (AB 2747)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1174.27.

(a) This section shall apply to an unlawful detainer proceeding in which all of the following are true:

(1) The proceeding involves a residential premises.

(2) The complaint includes a cause of action based on an act of abuse or violence against a tenant, a tenant’s immediate family member, or a tenant’s household member.

(3) A defendant has invoked paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 1161.3 as an affirmative defense to the cause of action described in paragraph (2).

(b) For the purposes of this section, the definitions in subdivision (a) of
 Section 1161.3 apply.

(c) The court shall determine whether there is documentation evidencing abuse or violence against the tenant, the tenant’s immediate family member, or the tenant’s household member.

(d) If the court determines there is not documentation evidencing abuse or violence against the tenant, the court shall deny the affirmative defense.

(e) If the court determines that there is documentation evidencing abuse or violence against the tenant, the tenant’s immediate family member, or the tenant’s household member, and the court does not find the defendant raising the affirmative defense guilty of an unlawful detainer on any other grounds, then both of the following:

(1) The defendant raising the affirmative defense and any other occupant not
 found guilty of an unlawful detainer shall not be guilty of an unlawful detainer and shall not be named in any judgment in favor of the landlord.

(2) The defendant raising the affirmative defense and any other occupant not found guilty of an unlawful detainer shall not be held liable to the landlord for any amount related to the unlawful detainer, including, but not limited to, holdover damages, court costs, lease termination fees, or attorney’s fees.

(f) (1) If the court makes the determination described in subdivision (e), upon a showing that any other defendant was the perpetrator of the abuse or violence on which the affirmative defense was based and is guilty of an unlawful detainer, the court shall do both of the following:

(A) Issue a partial eviction ordering the removal of the
 perpetrator of abuse or violence and ordering that person be immediately removed and barred from the dwelling unit, but the court shall not order the tenancy terminated.

(B) Order the landlord to change the locks and to provide the remaining occupants with the new key.

(2) If a court issues a partial eviction order as described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), then only a defendant found guilty of an unlawful detainer may be liable for holdover damages, court costs, lease termination fees, or attorney’s fees, as applicable.

(3) If the court makes the determination described in subdivision (e), the court may, upon a showing that any other defendant was the perpetrator of the abuse or violence on which the affirmative defense was based and is guilty of an unlawful detainer, do any of the following:

(A) Permanently bar the perpetrator of abuse or violence from entering any portion of the residential premises.

(B) Order as an express condition of the tenancy that the remaining occupants shall not give permission to or invite the perpetrator of abuse or violence to live in the dwelling unit.

(4) In exercising its discretion under this subdivision, the court shall take into account custody or visitation orders or arrangements and any other factor that may necessitate the temporary reentry of the perpetrator of abuse or violence.

(g) The Judicial Council shall develop a judgment form for use in a ruling pursuant to subdivision (e) or (f).

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, a determination
 that a person is a perpetrator of abuse or violence under subdivision (e) or (f) shall not constitute a finding that the person is a perpetrator of abuse or violence for any other purposes and shall not be admissible as evidence that the person committed a crime or is a perpetrator of abuse or violence in any other proceeding, including, but not limited to, a civil action or proceeding, a criminal action or proceeding, and a proceeding involving a juvenile for a criminal offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 558, Sec. 3.   (SB 1017)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1174.3.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), unless a prejudgment claim of right to possession has been served upon occupants in accordance with Section 415.46, any occupant not named in the judgment for possession who occupied the premises on the date of the filing of the action may object to enforcement of the judgment against that occupant by filing a
 claim of right to possession as prescribed in this section. A claim of right to possession may be filed at any time after service or posting of the writ of possession pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 715.020, up to and including the time at which the levying officer returns to effect the eviction of those named in the judgment of possession. Filing the claim of right to possession shall constitute a general appearance for which a fee shall be collected as provided in Section 70614 of the Government Code. Section 68511.3 of the Government Code applies to the claim of right to possession. An occupant or tenant who is named in the action shall not be required to file a claim of right to possession to protect that occupant’s right to possession of the premises.

(2) In an action as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 415.46, an occupant may file a claim of right to possession at any time up to and including the time
 at which the levying officer returns to effect the eviction of those named in the judgment of possession, without regard to whether a prejudgment claim of right to possession has been served upon the occupant.

(b) The court issuing the writ of possession of real property shall set a date or dates when the court will hold a hearing to determine the validity of objections to enforcement of the judgment specified in subdivision (a). An occupant of the real property for which the writ is issued may make an objection to eviction to the levying officer at the office of the levying officer or at the premises at the time of the eviction.

If a claim of right to possession is completed and presented to the sheriff, marshal, or other levying officer, the officer shall forthwith (1) stop the eviction of occupants at the premises, and (2) provide a receipt or copy of the completed claim of right of possession to
 the claimant indicating the date and time the completed form was received, and (3) deliver the original completed claim of right to possession to the court issuing the writ of possession of real property.

(c) A claim of right to possession is effected by any of the following:

(1) Presenting a completed claim form in person with identification to the sheriff, marshal, or other levying officer as prescribed in this section, and delivering to the court within two court days after its presentation, an amount equal to 15 days’ rent together with the appropriate fee or form for proceeding in forma pauperis. Upon receipt of a claim of right to possession, the sheriff, marshal, or other levying officer shall indicate thereon the date and time of its receipt and forthwith deliver the original to the issuing court and a receipt or copy of the claim to the claimant and notify the plaintiff
 of that fact. Immediately upon receipt of an amount equal to 15 days’ rent and the appropriate fee or form for proceeding in forma pauperis, the court shall file the claim of right to possession and serve an endorsed copy with the notice of the hearing date on the plaintiff and the claimant by first-class mail. The court issuing the writ of possession shall set and hold a hearing on the claim not less than five nor more than 15 days after the claim is filed with the court.

(2) Presenting a completed claim form in person with identification to the sheriff, marshal, or other levying officer as prescribed in this section, and delivering to the court within two court days after its presentation, the appropriate fee or form for proceeding in forma pauperis without delivering the amount equivalent to 15 days’ rent. In this case, the court shall immediately set a hearing on the claim to be held on the fifth day after the filing is completed. The court
 shall notify the claimant of the hearing date at the time the claimant completes the filing by delivering to the court the appropriate fee or form for proceeding in forma pauperis, and shall notify the plaintiff of the hearing date by first-class mail. Upon receipt of a claim of right to possession, the sheriff, marshal, or other levying officer shall indicate thereon the date and time of its receipt and forthwith deliver the original to the issuing court and a receipt or copy of the claim to the claimant and notify the plaintiff of that fact.

(d) At the hearing, the court shall determine whether there is a valid claim of possession by the claimant who filed the claim, and the court shall consider all evidence produced at the hearing, including, but not limited to, the information set forth in the claim. The court may determine the claim to be valid or invalid based upon the evidence presented at the hearing. The court shall determine the claim
 to be invalid if the court determines that the claimant is an invitee, licensee, guest, or trespasser. If the court determines the claim is invalid, the court shall order the return to the claimant of the amount of the 15 days’ rent paid by the claimant, if that amount was paid pursuant to paragraph (1) or (3) of subdivision (c), less a pro rata amount for each day that enforcement of the judgment was delayed by reason of making the claim of right to possession, which pro rata amount shall be paid to the landlord. If the court determines the claim is valid, the amount equal to 15 days’ rent paid by the claimant shall be returned immediately to the claimant.

(e) If, upon hearing, the court determines that the claim is valid, then the court shall order further proceedings as follows:

(1) If the unlawful detainer is based upon a curable breach, and the claimant was not previously
 served with a proper notice, if any notice is required, then the required notice may at the plaintiff’s discretion be served on the claimant at the hearing or thereafter. If the claimant does not cure the breach within the required time, then a supplemental complaint may be filed and served on the claimant as defendant if the plaintiff proceeds against the claimant in the same action. For the purposes of this section only, service of the required notice, if any notice is required, and of the supplemental complaint may be made by first-class mail addressed to the claimant at the subject premises or upon his or her attorney of record and, in either case, Section 1013 shall otherwise apply. Further proceedings on the merits of the claimant’s continued right to possession after service of the Summons and Supplemental Complaint as prescribed by this subdivision shall be conducted pursuant to this chapter.

(2) In all other cases, the court shall deem
 the unlawful detainer Summons and Complaint to be amended on their faces to include the claimant as defendant, service of the Summons and Complaint, as thus amended, may at the plaintiff’s discretion be made at the hearing or thereafter, and the claimant thus named and served as a defendant in the action shall answer or otherwise respond within five days thereafter.

(f) If a claim is made without delivery to the court of the appropriate filing fee or a form for proceeding in forma pauperis, as prescribed in this section, the claim shall be immediately deemed denied and the court shall so order. Upon the denial of the claim, the court shall immediately deliver an endorsed copy of the order to the levying officer and shall serve an endorsed copy of the order on the plaintiff and claimant by first-class mail.

(g) If the claim of right to possession is denied pursuant to subdivision
 (f), or if the claimant fails to appear at the hearing or, upon hearing, if the court determines that there are no valid claims, or if the claimant does not prevail at a trial on the merits of the unlawful detainer action, the court shall order the levying officer to proceed with enforcement of the original writ of possession of real property as deemed amended to include the claimant, which shall be effected within a reasonable time not to exceed five days. Upon receipt of the court’s order, the levying officer shall enforce the writ of possession of real property against any occupant or occupants.

(h) The claim of right to possession shall be made on the following form:

* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *

 NOTICE OF INCOMPLETE TEXT: The Claim of Right to 
 Possession form appears in the published chaptered bill.
 
 See Sec. 9, Chapter 913 (pp. 81–83), Statutes of 2014. 

* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 913, Sec. 9.   (AB 2747)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Note: See published chaptered bill for complete section text. The Claim of Right to Possession form appears on pages 81 to 83 of Ch. 913.)
-------------------------------------------

1174.5.

A judgment in unlawful detainer declaring the forfeiture of the lease or agreement under which real property is held shall not relieve the lessee from liability pursuant to Section 1951.2 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 488, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1176.

(a) An appeal taken by the defendant shall not automatically stay proceedings upon the judgment. Petition for stay of the judgment pending appeal shall first be directed to the judge before whom it was rendered. Stay of judgment shall be granted when the court finds that the moving party will suffer extreme hardship in the absence of a stay and that the nonmoving party will not be irreparably injured by its issuance. If the stay is denied by the trial court, the defendant may forthwith file a petition for an extraordinary writ with the appropriate appeals court. If the trial or appellate
 court stays enforcement of the judgment, the court may condition the stay on whatever conditions the court deems just, but in any case it shall order the payment of the reasonable monthly rental value to the court monthly in advance as rent would otherwise become due as a condition of issuing the stay of enforcement. As used in this subdivision, “reasonable rental value” means the contract rent unless the rental value has been modified by the trial court in which case that modified rental value shall be used.

(b) A new cause of action on the same agreement for the rental of real property shall not be barred because of an appeal by any party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1279, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1177.

Except as otherwise provided in this Chapter the provisions of Part II of this Code are applicable to, and constitute the rules of practice in the proceedings mentioned in this Chapter.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1178.

The provisions of Part 2 of this code, relative to new trials and appeals, except insofar as they are inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter or with rules adopted by the Judicial Council, apply to the proceedings mentioned in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

1179.

The court may relieve a tenant against a forfeiture of a lease or rental agreement, whether written or oral, and whether or not the tenancy has terminated, and restore him or her to his or her former estate or tenancy, in case of hardship, as provided in Section 1174. The court has the discretion to relieve any person against forfeiture on its own motion.

An application for relief against forfeiture may be made at any time prior to restoration of the premises to the landlord. The application may be made by a tenant or